Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 1. Licensing.

Sec. 06.20.010.
License required.

A person may not engage in the business of making loans of money, credit, goods, or things in action in the amount or of the value of $25,000 or less and charge, contract for, or receive on the loan a greater rate of interest, discount, or consideration than the lender would be permitted by law to charge if the person were not a licensee under this chapter, except as authorized by this chapter and without first obtaining a license from the department.

A person who is doing business under and as permitted by any law of the state or of the United States relating to banks, savings banks, trust companies, building and loan associations, or credit unions and who is exempt from the licensing requirement in (a) of this section shall comply with all other provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 23 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1980; am § 49 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For the legal rate of interest in Alaska, see AS

45.45.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This chapter licenses only persons engaging in “the business of making loans of money, credit, goods, or things in action in the amount or of the value of $1,000 (now $25,000) or less . . .” and who wish to charge a greater rate of interest than that otherwise provided by law. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Those required to be licensees under this chapter are “lenders of money.” 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 16.

Collateral references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d, Moneylenders and Pawnbrokers, §§ 11-14, 39, 40.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 16-21.

Statutory limit on period of small loans. 58 ALR2d 1263.

Sec. 06.20.020.
Application for license; disclosure for child support purposes.

Application for a license shall be in writing under oath, and in the form prescribed by the department, and must contain the name and the residence and business address of the applicant, the district and municipality with street and number, if any, where the business is to be conducted and other information as the department may require. If the applicant is a copartnership or association, the application must contain the residence and business address of each member; if the applicant is a corporation, the application must contain the residence and business address of each officer and director.

In addition to the requirements in (a) of this section, if a natural person makes application for a license, the applicant shall supply the applicant’s social security number to the department. Upon request, the department shall provide the social security number to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.030.
Fees and charges.

Investigation expenses incurred by the department in processing an application for licensure shall be charged to and paid by the applicant under AS

06.01.010

. At the time of submitting the application to the commissioner, the applicant shall pay to the department $1,000 in partial payment of those investigation expenses incurred by the department.

An applicant shall pay to the department at the time of submitting an application a sum, in addition to that specified in (a) of this section, of $500 for a single office license, or $2,000 for a multiple office license as an annual license fee for a period terminating on the last day of the current calendar year.

The license fee required by this section is in place of the fee under AS 43.70 (Alaska Business License Act).

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 44 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

The word “fee” was substituted for “tax levied” in (c) of this section in 1988 to conform the language to changes in AS 43.70 in 1978 and 1984.

Sec. 06.20.040.
Liquid assets required.

An applicant shall prove, in form satisfactory to the department, that the applicant has available for the operation of the business at the location specified in the application, liquid assets of at least $25,000, or, in the case of a multiple office license, that the equivalent amount is available to each office from a central account maintained by the applicant.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.050.
Bond.

The applicant shall file with the application a bond to be approved by the department in which the applicant shall be the obligor, in the sum of $25,000 with one or more sureties. Only one bond is required for an application for a multiple office license. The bond shall be for the use of the state and any person who may have a cause of action against the obligor under this chapter. The bond must state that the obligor will faithfully conform to and abide by the provisions of this chapter and of all regulations lawfully adopted by the department, and will pay to the state and to any person all money that may become due or owing to the state or to the person from the applicant under this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.060.
Issuance of license.

Upon the filing of the application, the payment of the fees and the approval of the bond, the department shall issue a license to the applicant if it finds upon investigation that (1) the financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and of its members if the applicant is a copartnership or association, and of its officers and directors if the applicant is a corporation, are such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant belief that the business will be operated honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter, and (2) allowing the applicant to engage in business at the location will provide accessibility and convenience for borrowers of money, and (3) the applicant has available for the operation of the business at the specific location liquid assets of at least $25,000, or, in the case of a multiple office license, that the equivalent amount is available to each office from a central account maintained by the applicant. The foregoing facts are conditions precedent to the issuance of a license under this chapter. The license permits the applicant to make loans in accordance with this chapter at the location or locations specified in the application. The license remains in full force and effect until it is surrendered by the licensee or revoked or suspended. If the department denies the application, it shall notify the applicant of the denial, bill the applicant for any outstanding expenses incurred by the department during the investigation and return the bond if those expenses have been paid. The department shall approve or deny every application for license within 60 days from the filing of the application with the fees and the approved bond. If the application is denied, the department shall, within 20 days thereafter, serve upon the applicant a copy of the written decision and findings. The decision and findings may be reviewed in the manner provided in AS

44.62.560

and

44.62.570

(Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 5 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 45 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Sec. 06.20.070.
Form, posting, and transfer of license.

The license must state the address at which the business is to be conducted and the full name of the licensee. If the licensee is a copartnership or association, the license must state the names of its members, and if a corporation, the date and place of its incorporation. The license shall be conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee. The license is not transferable or assignable.

History.

(§ 6 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.080.
Additional bond.

If at any time the department finds that the bond is unsatisfactory for any reason, it may require the licensee to file, within 10 days after the receipt of a written demand therefor, an additional bond complying with the provisions of AS

06.20.050

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 73 SLA 1955)

Sec. 06.20.090.
Places of business.

A licensee may maintain only one place of business under a single office license, or up to 10 places of business under each multiple office license. The department may issue more than one license to the same licensee upon compliance with the provisions of this chapter governing the original issuance of a license.

If a licensee changes the place of business to another location within the same municipality, the licensee shall give written notice to the department in advance. Upon approval, the department shall issue an amended license for the new location. A licensee may not change the place of business to a location outside the municipality in which the licensee is authorized to do business.

History.

(§ 8 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 71 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 134 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For small loans, see 3 AAC 12.

Sec. 06.20.100.
New bond.

On or before December 20 of each year, each licensee shall file a new bond that complies with AS

06.20.050

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 73 SLA 1955; am § 46 ch 169 SLA 1978)